Wisconsin, session 2025, AB370.
do enact as follows:AB370,14Section 1. 302.113 (9g) (g) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB370,2,131302.113 (9g) (g) 3. The director of state courts shall design and prepare cards 2for a victim to send to the clerk of the circuit court for the county in which the 3inmate was convicted and sentenced. The cards shall have space for a victim to 4provide his or her name and address, the name of the applicable inmate, and any 5other information that the director of state courts determines is necessary. The 6director of state courts shall provide the cards, without charge, to clerks of circuit 7court and to county victim and witness offices, as defined in s. 950.02 (4m). Clerks 8of circuit court or, if the county has a victim and witness office, as defined in s. 9950.02 (4m), the county victim and witness office, shall provide the cards, without 10charge, to victims. Victims may send completed cards to the clerk of the circuit 11court for the county in which the inmate was convicted and sentenced. All court 12records or portions of records that relate to mailing addresses of victims are not 13subject to inspection or copying under s. 19.35 (1).AB370,214Section 2. 302.114 (6) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB370,3,315302.114 (6) (e) The director of state courts shall design and prepare cards for 16a victim to send to the clerk of the circuit court in which the inmate is convicted and 17sentenced. The cards shall have space for a victim to provide his or her name and 18address, the name of the applicable inmate and any other information the director 19of state courts determines is necessary. The director of state courts shall provide 20the cards, without charge, to clerks of circuit court and to county victim and witness 21offices, as defined in s. 950.02 (4m). Clerks of circuit court or, if the county has a 22victim and witness office, as defined in s. 950.02 (4m), the county victim and 23witness office, shall provide the cards, without charge, to victims. Victims may 24send completed cards to the clerk of the circuit court in which the inmate was 1convicted and sentenced. All court records or portions of records that relate to 2mailing addresses of victims are not subject to inspection or copying under s. 19.35 3(1).AB370,34Section 3. 950.06 (1m) (dg) of the statutes is created to read:AB370,3,85950.06 (1m) (dg) Information pertaining to victim notifications for court 6proceedings that relate to modification of a criminal defendant’s sentence or period 7of probation, including providing and assistance completing victim notification 8cards, as required under s. 302.113 (9g) (g) 3., 302.114 (6) (e), or 973.09 (3m) (c).AB370,49Section 4. 973.09 (3m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB370,3,2210973.09 (3m) (c) The director of state courts shall design and prepare cards for 11a victim to send to the clerk of the circuit court for the county in which the 12probationer was convicted and sentenced. The cards shall have space for a victim to 13provide his or her name and address, the name of the applicable probationer, and 14any other information that the director of state courts determines is necessary. The 15director of state courts shall provide the cards, without charge, to clerks of circuit 16court and to county victim and witness offices, as defined in s. 950.02 (4m). Clerks 17of circuit court or, if the county has a victim and witness office, as defined in s. 18950.02 (4m), the county victim and witness office, shall provide the cards, without 19charge, to victims. Victims may send completed cards to the clerk of the circuit 20court for the county in which the probationer was convicted and sentenced. All 21court records or portions of records that relate to mailing addresses of victims are 22not subject to inspection or copying under s. 19.35 (1).AB370,3,2323